uz_UZ.aff
SFX X g gmaganligida g
SFX X g gmaganligimiz g
SFX X g gmaganligimizni g
SFX X g gmaganligimizning g
SFX X g gmaganligimizga g
SFX X g gmaganligimizdan g
SFX X g gmaganligimizda g
SFX X g gmaganligingiz g
SFX X g gmaganligingizni g
SFX X g gmaganligingizning g
SFX X g gmaganligingizga g
SFX X g gmaganligingizdan g
SFX X g gmaganligingizda g
SFX X g gmaganliklari g
SFX X g gmaganliklarini g
SFX X g gmaganliklarining g
SFX X g gmaganliklariga g
SFX X g gmaganliklaridan g
SFX X g gmaganliklarida g
SFX X 0 qanligim q
SFX X 0 qanligimni q
SFX X 0 qanligimning q
SFX X 0 qanligimga q
SFX X 0 qanligimdan q
SFX X 0 qanligimda q
SFX X 0 qanliging q
SFX X 0 qanligingni q
SFX X 0 qanligingning q
SFX X 0 qanligingga q
SFX X 0 qanligingdan q
SFX X 0 qanligingda q
SFX X 0 qanligi q
SFX X 0 qanligini q
SFX X 0 qanligining q
SFX X 0 qanligiga q
SFX X 0 qanligidan q
SFX X 0 qanligida q
SFX X 0 qanligimiz q
SFX X 0 qanligimizni q
SFX X 0 qanligimizning q
SFX X 0 qanligimizga q
SFX X 0 qanligimizdan q
SFX X 0 qanligimizda q
SFX X 0 qanligingiz q
SFX X 0 qanligingizni q
SFX X 0 qanligingizning q
SFX X 0 qanligingizga q
SFX X 0 qanligingizdan q
SFX X 0 qanligingizda q
SFX X 0 qanliklari q
SFX X 0 qanliklarini q
SFX X 0 qanliklarining q
SFX X 0 qanliklariga q
SFX X 0 qanliklaridan q
SFX X 0 qanliklarida q
SFX X 0 maganligim q
SFX X 0 maganligimni q
SFX X 0 maganligimning q
SFX X 0 maganligimga q
SFX X 0 maganligimdan q
SFX X 0 maganligimda q
SFX X 0 maganliging q
SFX X 0 maganligingni q
SFX X 0 maganligingning q
SFX X 0 maganligingga q
SFX X 0 maganligingdan q
SFX X 0 maganligingda q
SFX X 0 maganligi q
SFX X 0 maganligini q
SFX X 0 maganligining q
SFX X 0 maganligiga q
SFX X 0 maganligidan q
SFX X 0 maganligida q
SFX X 0 maganligimiz q
SFX X 0 maganligimizni q
SFX X 0 maganligimizning q
SFX X 0 maganligimizga q
SFX X 0 maganligimizdan q
SFX X 0 maganligimizda q
SFX X 0 maganligingiz q
SFX X 0 maganligingizni q
SFX X 0 maganligingizning q
SFX X 0 maganligingizga q
SFX X 0 maganligingizdan q
SFX X 0 maganligingizda q
SFX X 0 maganliklari q
SFX X 0 maganliklarini q
SFX X 0 maganliklarining q
SFX X 0 maganliklariga q
SFX X 0 maganliklaridan q
SFX X 0 maganliklarida q
SFX X 0 ganligim [^gq]
SFX X 0 ganligimni [^gq]
SFX X 0 ganligimning [^gq]
SFX X 0 ganligimga [^gq]
SFX X 0 ganligimdan [^gq]
SFX X 0 ganligimda [^gq]
SFX X 0 ganliging [^gq]
SFX X 0 ganligingni [^gq]
SFX X 0 ganligingning [^gq]
SFX X 0 ganligingga [^gq]
SFX X 0 ganligingdan [^gq]
SFX X 0 ganligingda [^gq]
SFX X 0 ganligi [^gq]
SFX X 0 ganligini [^gq]
SFX X 0 ganligining [^gq]
SFX X 0 ganligiga [^gq]
SFX X 0 ganligidan [^gq]
SFX X 0 ganligida [^gq]
SFX X 0 ganligimiz [^gq]
SFX X 0 ganligimizni [^gq]
SFX X 0 ganligimizning [^gq]
SFX X 0 ganligimizga [^gq]
SFX X 0 ganligimizdan [^gq]
SFX X 0 ganligimizda [^gq]
SFX X 0 ganligingiz [^gq]
SFX X 0 ganligingizni [^gq]
SFX X 0 ganligingizning [^gq]
SFX X 0 ganligingizga [^gq]
SFX X 0 ganligingizdan [^gq]
SFX X 0 ganligingizda [^gq]
SFX X 0 ganliklari [^gq]
SFX X 0 ganliklarini [^gq]
SFX X 0 ganliklarining [^gq]
SFX X 0 ganliklariga [^gq]
SFX X 0 ganliklaridan [^gq]
SFX X 0 ganliklarida [^gq]
SFX X 0 maganligim [^gq]
SFX X 0 maganligimni [^gq]
SFX X 0 maganligimning [^gq]
SFX X 0 maganligimga [^gq]
SFX X 0 maganligimdan [^gq]
SFX X 0 maganligimda [^gq]
SFX X 0 maganliging [^gq]
SFX X 0 maganligingni [^gq]
SFX X 0 maganligingning [^gq]
SFX X 0 maganligingga [^gq]
SFX X 0 maganligingdan [^gq]
SFX X 0 maganligingda [^gq]
SFX X 0 maganligi [^gq]
SFX X 0 maganligini [^gq]
SFX X 0 maganligining [^gq]
SFX X 0 maganligiga [^gq]
SFX X 0 maganligidan [^gq]
SFX X 0 maganligida [^gq]
SFX X 0 maganligimiz [^gq]
SFX X 0 maganligimizni [^gq]
SFX X 0 maganligimizning [^gq]
SFX X 0 maganligimizga [^gq]
SFX X 0 maganligimizdan [^gq]
SFX X 0 maganligimizda [^gq]
SFX X 0 maganligingiz [^gq]
SFX X 0 maganligingizni [^gq]
SFX X 0 maganligingizning [^gq]
SFX X 0 maganligingizga [^gq]
SFX X 0 maganligingizdan [^gq]
SFX X 0 maganligingizda [^gq]
SFX X 0 maganliklari [^gq]
SFX X 0 maganliklarini [^gq]
SFX X 0 maganliklarining [^gq]
SFX X 0 maganliklariga [^gq]
SFX X 0 maganliklaridan [^gq]
SFX X 0 maganliklarida [^gq]
SFX X 0 moqda .
SFX X 0 moqdami .
SFX X 0 moqdadir .
SFX X 0 moqda-da .
SFX X 0 moqdadir-da .
SFX X 0 moqdamikan .
SFX X 0 moqda-ku .
SFX X 0 moqdaki .
SFX X 0 moqda-chi .
SFX X 0 moqdakimi .
SFX X 0 moqdakidir .
SFX X 0 moqdaki-da .
SFX X 0 moqdakidir-da .
SFX X 0 moqdakimikan .
SFX X 0 moqdaki-ku .
SFX X 0 moqdakiki .
SFX X 0 moqdaki-chi .
SFX X 0 moqqa .
SFX X 0 moqqami .
SFX X 0 moqqadir .
SFX X 0 moqqa-da .
SFX X 0 moqqadir-da .
SFX X 0 moqqamikan .
SFX X 0 moqqa-ku .
SFX X 0 moqqaki .
SFX X 0 moqqa-chi .
SFX X 0 moqning .
SFX X 0 moqningmi .
SFX X 0 moqningdir .
SFX X 0 moqning-da .
SFX X 0 moqningdir-da .
SFX X 0 moqningmikan .
SFX X 0 moqning-ku .
SFX X 0 moqningki .
SFX X 0 moqning-chi .
SFX X 0 moqdan .
SFX X 0 moqdanmi .
SFX X 0 moqdandir .
SFX X 0 moqdan-da .
SFX X 0 moqdandir-da .
SFX X 0 moqdanmikan .
SFX X 0 moqdan-ku .
SFX X 0 moqdanki .
SFX X 0 moqdan-chi .
SFX X 0 moqni .
SFX X 0 moqnimi .
SFX X 0 moqnidir .
SFX X 0 moqni-da .
SFX X 0 moqnidir-da .
SFX X 0 moqnimikan .
SFX X 0 moqni-ku .
SFX X 0 moqniki .
SFX X 0 moqni-chi .
SFX X 0 moqqacha .
SFX X 0 moqqachami .
SFX X 0 moqqachadir .
SFX X 0 moqqacha-da .
SFX X 0 moqqachadir-da .
SFX X 0 moqqachamikan .
SFX X 0 moqqacha-ku .
SFX X 0 moqqachaki .
SFX X 0 moqqacha-chi .
SFX X 0 moqqina .
SFX X 0 moqdayu .
SFX X 0 moqchiyu .
SFX X 0 moqqayu .
SFX X 0 moqdanu .
SFX X 0 moqniku .
SFX X 0 moqdek .
SFX X 0 moq/ADVIJKLM .
SFX X a ovchi/ABVIJKLM a
SFX X ya yovchi/ABVIJKLM ya
SFX X 0 lovchi/ABVIJKLM u
SFX X 0 uvchi/ABVIJKLM [^au]

SFX Y Y 79
SFX Y 0 ki .
SFX Y 0 -ku .
SFX Y 0 -da .
SFX Y 0 -ov .
SFX Y 0 mi .
SFX Y 0 mikan .
SFX Y 0 da .
SFX Y 0 man .
SFX Y 0 manki .
SFX Y 0 man-ku .
SFX Y 0 man-da .
SFX Y 0 man-u .
SFX Y 0 man-ov .
SFX Y 0 manmi .
SFX Y 0 manmikan .
SFX Y 0 manda .
SFX Y 0 miz .
SFX Y 0 mizki .
SFX Y 0 miz-ku .
SFX Y 0 miz-da .
SFX Y 0 miz-u .
SFX Y 0 miz-ov .
SFX Y 0 mizmi .
SFX Y 0 mizmikan .
SFX Y 0 mizda .
SFX Y 0 san .
SFX Y 0 sanki .
SFX Y 0 san-ku .
SFX Y 0 san-da .
SFX Y 0 san-u .
SFX Y 0 san-ov .
SFX Y 0 sanmi .
SFX Y 0 sanmikan .
SFX Y 0 sanda .
SFX Y 0 siz .
SFX Y 0 sizki .
SFX Y 0 siz-ku .
SFX Y 0 siz-da .
SFX Y 0 siz-u .
SFX Y 0 siz-ov .
SFX Y 0 sizmi .
SFX Y 0 sizmikan .
SFX Y 0 sizda .
SFX Y 0 sanlar .
SFX Y 0 sanlarki .
SFX Y 0 sanlar-ku .
SFX Y 0 sanlar-da .
SFX Y 0 sanlar-u .
SFX Y 0 sanlar-ov .
SFX Y 0 sanlarmi .
SFX Y 0 sanlarmikan .
SFX Y 0 sanlarda .
SFX Y 0 sizlar .
SFX Y 0 sizlarki .
SFX Y 0 sizlar-ku .
SFX Y 0 sizlar-da .
SFX Y 0 sizlar-u .
SFX Y 0 sizlar-ov .
SFX Y 0 sizlarmi .
SFX Y 0 sizlarmikan .
SFX Y 0 sizlarda .
SFX Y 0 di .
SFX Y 0 diki .
SFX Y 0 di-ku .
SFX Y 0 di-da .
SFX Y 0 di-yu .
SFX Y 0 di-ov .
SFX Y 0 dimi .
SFX Y 0 dimikan .
SFX Y 0 dida .
SFX Y 0 dilar .
SFX Y 0 dilarki .
SFX Y 0 dilar-ku .
SFX Y 0 dilar-da .
SFX Y 0 dilar-u .
SFX Y 0 dilar-ov .
SFX Y 0 dilarmi .
SFX Y 0 dilarmikan .
SFX Y 0 dilarda .
