uz_UZ.dic
achintir/X
afshonla/X
ajraltir/X
aktivlantiril/X
aldan/X
almashla/X
angʻishlat/X
anqovsira/X
ardoqlan/X
arttir/X
asoslashtir/X
atirla/X
axborotlashtiril/X
ayirish/X
ayriboshlattir/X
azotlat/X
bagʻirla/X
balandla/X
baravarlash/X
bastalan/X
begonalashtiril/X
belashtir/X
berdirt/X
betartiblash/X
bezan/X
bichiltir/X
biji/X
bilqillat/X
birlashish/X
bizilla/X
boʻgʻish/X
boʻlash/X
boʻrozlash/X
boʻtanalan/X
boʻzlat/X
boqish/X
boshlattir/X
botiril/X
bugʻlantiril/X
buktir/X
burat/X
burovlash/X
butunlat/X
byurokratlash/X
chalkashlan/X
changalla/X
chaplat/X
chaq/X
chati/X
chaypa/X
chekchay/X
chetlatil/X
chilpi/X
chinqirish/X
chiranish/X
chirqirash/X
chiyral/X
choʻchchay/X
choʻlla/X
choʻqin/X
choʻzish/X
chovlila/X
chuldurat/X
chuvashtiril/X
chuy/X
dangasalan/X
darozlash/X
davrlashtiril/X
demagoglash/X
dezalkilla/X
dimiq/X
dixotomlan/X
doʻmpay/X
doʻray/X
dovdira/X
dumalash/X
egalla/X
ehtiyotla/X
elektrlash/X
emlat/X
erishil/X
eskart/X
ezgʻilan/X
falajlan/X
fokuslan/X
galdirat/X
gapiril/X
gazlashtiril/X
gʻaldira/X
gʻichirla/X
gʻimirlash/X
gʻiringla/X
gʻoʻngʻillash/X
gʻujanakla/X
gidrogenla/X
goʻlay/X
gullattir/X
gupur/X
guvlash/X
hallosla/X
haqoratla/X
havolantir/X
hayolla/X
hilpillat/X
hisobla/X
hoshiyala/X
huquqsizlan/X
huzurlan/X
ifloslan/X
ilak/X
ilhomlan/X
ilojsizlan/X
individuallashtiril/X
ingra/X
integratsiyalash/X
iqrorlan/X
irshay/X
ishon/X
isish/X
issiqlat/X
ivitish/X
iydir/X
izolyatsiyalan/X
jagʻirla/X
janjallash/X
jazilla/X
jildla/X
jimilla/X
jipslashtiril/X
jiy/X
joʻrilla/X
joylashtirish/X
kafanlan/X
kaltsiylan/X
kapsulala/X
kataloglashtir/X
kechiktiril/X
kekirtir/X
kemiril/X
kert/X
ketkazil/X
kifoyalan/X
kirkillash/X
kishtkishtla/X
klonla/X
koʻkartiril/X
koʻm/X
koʻpchi/X
koʻrishtiril/X
koʻzala/X
kondensatlan/X
kooperatsiyala/X
koyi/X
kuchlan/X
kulimsi/X
kurmakla/X
kuyin/X
lablan/X
laxtala/X
lipillat/X
loʻqilla/X
loylash/X
magʻrurlantiril/X
majolsizlantir/X
markalan/X
masxaralan/X
mayllan/X
maʼyuslan/X
meʼyorlashtir/X
mikromoliyalashtir/X
mingash/X
misqolla/X
mohirlan/X
moʻtabarlashtir/X
moslash/X
mubohasalash/X
mujmallashtir/X
munglan/X
mushkullashtir/X
muvofiqla/X
nahslan/X
nasihatla/X
negizlan/X
nimtalan/X
nishtarla/X
noli/X
noshodlan/X
nuratil/X
obdirat/X
ochilish/X
oddiylash/X
ogʻrit/X
oʻchiraver/X
oʻgitla/X
oʻlchanil/X
oʻngarish/X
oʻpir/X
oʻqla/X
oʻrdir/X
oʻrlat/X
oʻrtoqlashil/X
oʻtin/X
oʻtlantir/X
oʻtroqlashtir/X
oʻylash/X
oʻy/X
oʻzlashtir/X
olimlash/X
olqishla/X
ontartir/X
oqlash/X
oriqla/X
orziq/X
oshlan/X
osudalash/X
ovuntiril/X
oyoqsizlan/X
pachkala/X
panjala/X
parla/X
pastkashlash/X
payhonlat/X
pichirlash/X
piltakachla/X
pishillash/X
pish/X
piypala/X
poʻpanakla/X
popillat/X
poygirla/X
puchuqlan/X
puxtalan/X
qadoqlat/X
qalashtir/X
qaltira/X
qanoatlan/X
qaqilla/X
qarittir/X
qashish/X
qatnal/X
qavar/X
qayishtir/X
qaytarish/X
qichin/X
qilichla/X
qimsin/X
qirmochlan/X
qisil/X
qitiqlan/X
qiyinlash/X
qiyqir/X
qizgʻanish/X
qochish/X
qoʻmsa/X
qoʻrgʻonla/X
qoʻshil/X
qoidalashtiril/X
qondirtir/X
qopish/X
qoq/X
qoshiqlash/X
qozon/X
qulayla/X
qumala/X
qurit/X
qurumla/X
qutqazil/X
quvnash/X
quyin/X
radlat/X
raqamla/X
rayonlashtiril/X
remontlat/X
roʻyxatlan/X
ruslashtir/X
salanglat/X
sanattir/X
sansirash/X
saranjomla/X
satanglan/X
sayohatlash/X
sekinla/X
sentrla/X
serrayish/X
sev/X
shagʻirla/X
shaloqla/X
shapaloqlat/X
sharillat/X
shatilla/X
shifola/X
shildira/X
shimartir/X
shipilla/X
shirqilla/X
shiypangla/X
shoʻrlash/X
shoshtiril/X
shtrixla/X
shuvilla/X
sihatlan/X
silliqlan/X
sinat/X
sintezla/X
siqta/X
sirla/X
sittir/X
siyqalashtir/X
sizsira/X
sogʻay/X
soʻktir/X
soʻndir/X
soʻtala/X
solin/X
sottiril/X
soxtalash/X
sudralish/X
sugʻurtala/X
suqishtir/X
surinish/X
surla/X
suvattir/X
suyan/X
suyuqlantir/X
tabaqalash/X
tajanglash/X
takrorlat/X
taltangla/X
tamponla/X
tanittir/X
taqalash/X
taqiqla/X
taraltir/X
tarbiyalat/X
tarqash/X
tasdiqlash/X
tashlattir/X
tasvirlat/X
taxminla/X
taysarla/X
taʼqiblan/X
tegishil/X
tekkizil/X
tentirash/X
tep/X
termala/X
teziktir/X
tigʻla/X
tiklat/X
tilishlan/X
timtalan/X
tingla/X
tipirlash/X
tiral/X
tirjayish/X
tirna/X
tishlan/X
titrash/X
tizillat/X
toʻdalash/X
toʻkislan/X
toʻlgʻa/X
toʻmtoqlash/X
toʻpillat/X
toʻqintir/X
toʻrsayish/X
toʻydirtir/X
toʻzimsizlan/X
tomchilantir/X
topirlat/X
toqila/X
tort/X
toydir/X
traktorlashtir/X
tugʻish/X
tumanlashtir/X
tupur/X
turlan/X
tushirtir/X
tutamla/X
tutqilash/X
tuzatish/X
uchirish/X
uchratil/X
ulash/X
uli/X
unashtir/X
unifikatsiyala/X
urdirtir/X
ushatil/X
uvalan/X
uxla/X
uygʻunlashtir/X
uy/X
uzish/X
vagʻvagʻla/X
valangla/X
varaqlat/X
vaysa/X
viqviqla/X
voqilla/X
vyorstkala/X
xaroblash/X
xavfsiran/X
xillashtir/X
xirilla/X
xlorla/X
xoʻshla/X
xonakilashtiril/X
xronogramma/X
xushlash/X
yalangʻochlat/X
yalpangla/X
yaltoqlan/X
yanglish/X
yaraqla/X
yasal/X
yashillan/X
yaxlitlashtiril/X
yechintir/X
yelik/X
yemir/X
yerparchinla/X
yetkizil/X
yigʻishtir/X
yiqitil/X
yir/X
yogʻlattir/X
yoʻllash/X
yoʻqot/X
yolchi/X
yomonlash/X
yonla/X
yoqalash/X
yorish/X
yoshla/X
yozdirgiz/X
yukun/X
yupqalan/X
yutqiz/X
zanginlash/X
zichlan/X
zoʻriqtiril/X
